Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2119.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42-7.2 of the General Laws entitled "Office of Health and Human
Services" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-7.2-21. Coverage for treatment for end stage renal disease and kidney transplants
for resident who does not qualify for full Medicaid.
(a) EOHHS to provide coverage. The executive office of health and human services
("EOHHS"), as the state agency designated to administer Rhode Island Medicaid pursuant to the
provisions of § 42-7.2-2, shall provide coverage for dialysis treatment of end stage renal disease
("ESRD"), as well as kidney transplants, for Rhode Island residents who do not qualify for full
Medicaid due to their immigration status, pursuant to the EOHHS administration of emergency
Medicaid.
(b) Coverage provided. Emergency Medicaid coverage under the provisions of this section
shall cover hemodialysis in both outpatient hospital settings and at freestanding dialysis centers.
Emergency Medicaid shall also cover peritoneal dialysis when clinically appropriate. Coverage
shall begin at the point the individual requires a fistula or indwelling venous catheter for expected
hemodialysis, or at the point of catheter insertion for peritoneal dialysis. ESRD treatment shall be
authorized for a period of twelve (12) months, subject to the patient’s continued eligibility for
Emergency Medicaid during that time period. Emergency Medicaid coverage under the provisions
of this section shall also cover kidney transplants for the same persons.

(c) Applicability. The provisions of this section shall apply to all individuals who qualify
for Medicaid, but whose benefits are limited pursuant to federal law to treatment of an "emergency
medical condition" due to their immigration status. Coverage under the provisions of this section
shall be available to both undocumented individuals and individuals who are qualified non-citizens,
but who have not met the five (5) year bar under federal law, which bar requires qualified non-
citizens to be present in the United States for five (5) years before they qualify for federal benefits
such as Medicaid.
(d) The EOHHS may promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this
section; provided, the EOHHS may delegate this authority to promulgate rules and regulations to
any or all of the state's health and human services departments and offices which the EOHHS
oversees and manages.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003832
========
LC003832 - Page 2 of 3